Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

45-16-1.
Election, commission, removal; qualifications; affidavit of qualification.

Coroners are elected, commissioned, and removed as are clerks of the superior courts; and coroners shall hold their offices for four years.

No person shall be eligible to offer for election to or to hold the office of coroner unless he or she:

Is a citizen of the United States;

Is a resident of the county in which he or she seeks the office of coroner for at least two years prior to his or her qualifying for the election to the office and remains a resident of such county during his or her term of office;

Is a registered voter;

Has attained the age of 25 years prior to the date of the general primary in the year he or she qualifies for election to the office;

Has obtained a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent. This subparagraph shall not apply to any person serving as a coroner on July 1, 1980;

Has not been convicted of a felony offense or any offense involving moral turpitude contrary to the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States; and

Has successfully completed the next scheduled class no longer than 180 days after such person’s election or appointment a basic training course provided by the Georgia Police Academy, but the affidavit required by paragraph (2) of this subsection shall not be required to affirm that the requirements of this subparagraph have been met at the time of qualifying for the office of coroner.

Each person offering his or her candidacy for the office of coroner shall file an affidavit with the officer before whom such person has qualified to seek the office of coroner prior to or at the time for qualifying, which affidavit shall affirm that he or she meets all of the qualifications required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person holding office as the mayor of a municipality with a population of 5,000 or less according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census is specifically authorized to serve simultaneously as coroner; and any person holding the office of coroner is specifically authorized to serve simultaneously as mayor of a municipality with a population of 5,000 or less according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 559; Code 1868, § 623; Code 1873, § 582; Code 1882, § 582; Civil Code 1895, § 491; Civil Code 1910, § 609; Ga. L. 1914, p. 43, § 1; Code 1933, § 21-101; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1987, p. 630, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 45; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1091, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1436, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 869, § 1.

Cross references.

Clerks of superior courts generally, §

15-6-50

et seq.

45-16-2.
Appointment of coroners where coroners not elected; filling vacancies.

Whenever an election fails to fill the office of coroner, the judge of the probate court shall appoint a person to serve as the coroner until a successor is duly elected in a special election which shall be held at the time of the next general election to serve out the remainder of the unexpired term of office.

In the event a vacancy occurs in the office of coroner, the judge of the probate court shall appoint a person to serve out the unexpired term of office and until his successor shall be duly elected and qualified.

No appointment or election under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be of any effect until proper bond and security is given and the oath of office is taken.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 560; Code 1868, § 624; Code 1873, § 583; Code 1882, § 583; Civil Code 1895, § 492; Civil Code 1910, § 610; Code 1933, § 21-102; Ga. L. 1988, p. 586, § 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 586, § 7, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable to any vacancy occurring on or after March 30, 1988.

45-16-3.
Oath.

Before beginning the duties of the office of coroner, a coroner shall take the oath required of all civil officers and shall take the following oath:

“I swear that I will well and truly serve the State of Georgia in said office and faithfully and truly execute all writs and precepts to me directed or which I may lawfully execute, when placed in my charge, and return the same according to the best of my knowledge, skill, and judgment; that I will in no case knowingly use or exercise my office illegally, corruptly, or unjustly and that I will not, under any pretense, take, accept, or enjoy any fee or reward pertaining to my office other than such as are allowed by law; but that I will, in all things touching the duties of my office, demean myself honestly, fairly, and impartially according to the best of my ability, so help me God.”

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 536; Code 1863, § 561; Code 1868, § 625; Code 1873, § 584; Code 1882, § 584; Civil Code 1895, § 493; Civil Code 1910, § 611; Code 1933, § 21-103.

45-16-4.
Bond generally; liability for moneys collected or failing to do duties.

A coroner shall give bond and surety in the sum of $12,500.00 at the same time as he takes the oath provided for in Code Section 45-16-3. He is liable for retaining moneys collected or for otherwise failing to do his duty as sheriffs are and is subject to the same proceedings.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 539; Code 1863, § 562; Code 1868, § 626; Code 1873, § 585; Code 1882, § 585; Civil Code 1895, § 494; Civil Code 1910, § 612; Code 1933, § 21-104; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 2.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, T. 45, C. 4.

45-16-5.
Additional bond when acting for sheriff.

When a coroner is required to act in the place of a sheriff, generally or specially, the judge of the probate court may require of him an additional bond in such sum and with such sureties as the judge, in his discretion, may think sufficient to meet the contingency.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 563; Code 1868, § 627; Code 1873, § 586; Code 1882, § 586; Civil Code 1895, § 495; Civil Code 1910, § 613; Code 1933, § 21-107.

Cross references.

Duty of coroner to act as keeper of county jail when sheriff is imprisoned or absent from county, §

42-4-3

.

45-16-6.
Participation in training course.

During every calendar year they are in office, every coroner and deputy coroner shall be required, as a condition of continuing to serve as coroner, to take a training course approved by the Georgia Coroner’s Training Council pursuant to Code Section 45-16-66.
Any coroner or deputy coroner taking the approved training course provided by the Georgia Police Academy shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly, plus reimbursement of actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the legal mileage rate for the use of a personal automobile and registration fees for such training course.
Such expense allowance and reimbursements shall be paid by the county governing authority from county funds.
In the event, however, that a coroner or deputy is prevented in any calendar year from taking such training by sickness or other providential cause, the requirement of training for that year may be waived by the Georgia Coroner’s Training Council.

History.

Code 1933, § 21-108, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 543, § 3; Code 1981, §

45-16-8

; Code 1981, §

45-16-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1539, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 333, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1436, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 356, § 1.

Cross references.

Annual training requirement for certified coroners, §

45-16-66

.

45-16-7.
Appointment of deputy coroners; oath, bond, fees, powers, and qualifications.

As soon as practicable after July 1, 1980, and at the beginning of each term of the coroner thereafter, the coroner of each county shall appoint a deputy coroner or coroners as provided in this Code section. A deputy coroner shall be appointed for each county, and one or more additional deputy coroners may be appointed for any county, in the discretion of the coroner. Each deputy coroner shall serve at the pleasure of the coroner and may be replaced by the coroner at any time. Each deputy coroner shall take the same oath, give the same bond, be entitled to the same fees, and have the same powers as the coroner; but a deputy coroner shall act as coroner only when the coroner is himself unable to act.

No person shall be eligible to hold the office of deputy coroner unless he or she holds a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent. Any deputy coroner who is in office on July 1, 1980, however, shall without limitation be eligible to serve as deputy coroner at any time after said date without regard to whether he or she meets the requirements of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, there shall be appointed only one deputy coroner, and, on and after July 1, 1999, there shall only be one deputy coroner in each such county unless otherwise approved by the local governing authority of the county.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 21-102.1, 21-108, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 543, §§ 1, 3; Code 1981, §§

45-16-7

,

45-16-8

; Code 1981, §

45-16-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 869, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

The 1985 amendment, effective April 3, 1985, in effect redesignated former §

45-16-7

as present subsection (a) of this Code section, without any change of language, and redesignated former § 45-16-8(a) as subsection (b) of this Code section.

45-16-8.
Service of process when sheriff disqualified.

If any person makes an affidavit stating (1) that a sheriff is disqualified from acting in any proceeding, which disqualification was not apparent at the outset of the proceeding, or (2) that a sheriff or his deputy refuses to serve a writ or other process, then the clerk of the court from which the process issues shall place the process in the hands of the coroner for execution. The clerk may compel the sheriff to return the writ or other process to the clerk’s office in order to allow for execution by the coroner.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 565; Code 1868, § 629; Code 1873, § 588; Code 1882, § 588; Civil Code 1895, § 496; Civil Code 1910, § 614; Code 1933, § 21-106; Code 1981, §

45-16-9

; Code 1981, §

45-16-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

The 1985 amendment, effective April 3, 1985, in effect renumbered former §

45-16-9

as this Code section, without any change of language. For present provisions similar to former §

45-16-8

, see §§

45-16-6

and

45-16-7(b)

.

45-16-9.
Fees.

When performing the duties of a sheriff, the coroner’s fees are the same as a sheriff’s.

This Code section shall not be construed to repeal or preempt any local Act or general Act of local application which places any coroner upon an annual salary or authorizes any coroner to receive fees in excess of those specified in this Code section.

History.

Laws 1792, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 352; Ga. L. 1859, p. 25, § 1; Code 1863, § 3625; Code 1868, § 3650; Code 1873, § 3701; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 73, § 1; Code 1882, § 3701; Penal Code 1895, § 1112; Penal Code 1910, § 1141; Code 1933, § 21-105; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 210, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 543, § 2; Code 1981, §

45-16-6

; Code 1981, §

45-16-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 3.

Cross references.

Fees for services of sheriff, §

15-16-21

.

Editor’s notes.

The 1985 amendment, effective April 3, 1985, in effect renumbered former §

45-16-6

as this Code section. For present provisions of former §

45-16-9

, see §

45-16-8

.

45-16-10.
Furnishing information to out-of-state coroners.

Records, papers, or reports concerning the death of a person on file at any hospital, nursing home, or other medical facility in this state shall be available to a coroner of another state if such person was injured in, a resident of, or buried in the county of such coroner in such other state or if such records, papers, or reports are the subject of a subpoena issued by the coroner of another state. The release of such records to the coroner of another state shall not be prohibited by Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1594, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 559, § 1.

45-16-11.
Compensation of county coroners; increases; calculation; supplements; expenses.

Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the minimum annual salary of each coroner in any of the counties in this state in the following population brackets shall be fixed according to the population of the county in which he or she serves, as determined by the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each such coroner shall receive an annual salary, payable in equal monthly installments from the funds of the coroner’s county, of not less than the amount fixed in the following schedule:

Click to view

Whenever the state employees subject to compensation plans authorized and approved in accordance with Code Section 45-20-4 receive a cost-of-living increase or general performance based increase of a certain percentage or a certain amount, the amounts fixed in the minimum salary schedule in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and in Code Section 45-16-11.1, or the amounts derived by increasing each of said amounts through the application of longevity increases pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, where applicable, shall be increased by the same percentage or same amount applicable to such state employees. If the cost-of-living increase or general performance based increase received by state employees is in different percentages or different amounts as to certain categories of employees, the amounts fixed in the minimum salary schedule in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and in Code Section 45-16-11.1, or the amounts derived through the application of longevity increases, shall be increased by a percentage or an amount not to exceed the average percentage or average amount of the general increase in salary granted to the state employees. The Office of Planning and Budget shall calculate the average percentage increase or average amount increase when necessary. The periodic changes in the amounts fixed in the minimum salary schedule in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and in Code Section 45-16-11.1, or the amounts derived through the application of longevity increases, as authorized by this paragraph shall become effective on the first day of January following the date that the cost-of-living increases received by state employees become effective; provided, however, that if the cost-of-living increases or general performance based increases received by state employees become effective on January 1, such periodic changes in the amounts fixed in the minimum salary schedule in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and in Code Section 45-16-11.1, or the amounts derived through the application of longevity increases, as authorized by this paragraph shall become effective on the same date that the cost-of-living increases or general performance based increases received by state employees become effective.

The county governing authority may supplement the minimum annual salary of the coroner in such amount as it may fix from time to time; but no coroner’s compensation supplement shall be decreased during any term of office. Any prior expenditure of county funds to supplement the coroner’s salary in the manner authorized by this paragraph is ratified and confirmed. Nothing contained in this paragraph shall prohibit the General Assembly by local law from supplementing the annual salary of the coroner.

The amounts provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section and Code Section 45-16-11.1, as increased by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be increased by multiplying said amounts by the percentage which equals 5 percent times the number of completed four-year terms of office served by any coroner after December 31, 2000, effective the first day of January following the completion of each such period of service.

The minimum salaries provided for under this Code section shall be in addition to any fees, including the death investigation fee provided for under subsection (b) of Code Section 45-16-27, paid by the county governing authority to the coroner on a per-call basis and in addition to any expenses.

The minimum salaries provided for in this Code section shall be considered as salary only. Expenses for deputies, equipment, supplies, copying equipment, and other necessary and reasonable expenses for the operation of a coroner’s office shall come from funds other than the funds specified as salary in this Code section.

This Code section shall not be construed to reduce the salary of any coroner in office on July 1, 2001; provided, however, that successors to such coroners in office on July 1, 2001, shall be governed by the provisions of this Code section. All local legislation in effect on July 1, 2001, or enacted thereafter affecting compensation for coroners of the various counties shall be of full force and effect except where the same provides for a salary lower than provided in this Code section, in which event this Code section shall prevail.

Population Minimum Salary 0 — 11,889 $ 1,200.00 11,890 — 19,999 2,400.00 20,000 — 34,999 3,600.00

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 18A; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-75/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 739, § 1/SB 226.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001. p. 902, § 18A, redesignated former Code Section 45-16-11 as present Code Section 45-16-11.1.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-16-11.1.
Compensation of county coroners for inmate deaths in state correctional institutions.

In addition to the minimum salary provided for in Code Section 45-16-11, in any county which is the site of more than one state correctional institution or prison for adults or juveniles and which compensates the county coroner by salary, the state shall compensate the county coroner in the amount of $110.00 for each state inmate death in such county. The county coroner of such a county is authorized to accept the compensation provided in accordance with this Code section despite any local Act which requires such a coroner to send fees to the county treasury or the county governing authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1159, § 17; Code 1981, §

45-16-11

.1, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 18A.

45-16-11.2.
Monthly contingent expense allowance for the operation of the office of coroner.

In addition to any salary, fees, or expenses now or hereafter provided by law, the governing authority of each of the counties in this state in the following population bracket is authorized to provide as contingent expenses for the operation of the office of coroner, and payable from county funds, a monthly expense allowance of not less than the amount fixed in the following schedule:

Population Minimum Monthly Expenses ————— ——————— 0 — 34,999 $ 50.00

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-11.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 18A; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45/HB 142.